Hawaii statutes.
§17-2 United States representative.
When a vacancy occurs in the representation of this State in the United States
House of Representatives, the chief election officer shall issue a proclamation
for an election to fill the vacancy. The proclamation shall be issued not
later than on the sixtieth day prior to the election to fill the vacancy and
shall contain the date, time, and places where the special election is to be
held, the time within which nomination papers shall be filed, the time for
transmitting to county clerks the notice designating the offices for which
candidates are to be elected, the time for transmitting to county clerks lists
of candidates to be voted for at the special election and such other matter as
provided for in section 11-91 and which are not inconsistent with this
section. The special election shall be conducted and the results ascertained
so far as practicable, in accordance with this title. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2;
am L 1973, c 217, §7(b); am L 1974, c 34, §4(a); gen ch 1985; am L 1986, c 305,
§6]

Attorney General Opinions

Conflicts with Article I, §2, of U.S. Constitution with
regard to unexpired terms for U.S. House of Representatives. Att. Gen. Op.
83-5.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next